Utah statutes.
63G-6-814.5 (Repealed 05/01/13).   Dismissal of an appeal not filed in compliance with requirements.

(1)  The protest officer may dismiss a protest described in Section 63G-6-801 that is not filed in accordance with the requirements of this chapter.

(2)  A procurement appeals panel may dismiss an appeal that is assigned to the procurement appeals panel if the appeal is not filed in accordance with the requirements of this chapter.

